California, session 20252026, AB2453.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21100 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21100. Local authorities may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution regarding all of the following matters:(a) Regulating or prohibiting a procession or assemblage on the highways.(b) Licensing and regulating the operation of vehicles for hire and drivers of passenger vehicles for hire.(c) Regulating traffic by means of traffic officers.(d) Regulating traffic by means of official traffic control devices meeting the requirements of Section 21400.(e) (1) Regulating traffic by means of a person given temporary or permanent appointment for that duty by the local authority when official traffic control devices are disabled or otherwise inoperable, at the scene of an accident or disaster, or at a location that may require traffic direction for orderly traffic flow.(2) A person shall not be appointed pursuant to this subdivision unless and until the local authority has submitted to the commissioner or to the chief law enforcement officer exercising jurisdiction in the enforcement of traffic laws within the area in which the person is to perform the duty, for review, a proposed program of instruction for the training of a person for that duty and unless and until the commissioner or other chief law enforcement officer approves the proposed program. The commissioner or other chief law enforcement officer shall approve a proposed program if they reasonably determine that the program will provide sufficient training for persons assigned to perform the duty described in this subdivision.(f) Regulating traffic at the site of road or street construction or maintenance by a person authorized for that duty by the local authority.(g) (1) Licensing and regulating the operation of tow truck service or tow truck drivers whose principal place of business or employment is within the jurisdiction of the local authority, excepting the operation and operators of any auto dismantlers’ tow vehicle licensed under Section 11505 or any tow truck operated by a repossessing agency licensed under Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code and its registered employees.(2) The Legislature finds that the safety and welfare of the general public is promoted by permitting local authorities to regulate tow truck service companies and operators by requiring licensure, insurance, and proper training in the safe operation of towing equipment, thereby ensuring against towing mistakes that may lead to violent confrontation, stranding motorists in dangerous situations, impeding the expedited vehicle recovery, and wasting state and local law enforcement’s limited resources.(3) This subdivision does not limit the authority of a city or city and county pursuant to Section 12111.(h) Operation of bicycles and, as specified in Section 21114.5, electric carts by physically disabled persons or persons 50 years of age or older, on public sidewalks.(i) Providing for the appointment of nonstudent school crossing guards for the protection of persons who are crossing a street or highway in the vicinity of a school or while returning thereafter to a place of safety.(j) Regulating the methods of deposit of garbage and refuse in streets and highways for collection by the local authority or by any person authorized by the local authority.(k) Regulating or authorizing the removal by peace officers of vehicles unlawfully parked in a fire lane, as described in Section 22500.1, on private property. A removal pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent, to the extent possible, with the procedures for removal and storage set forth in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 22650).(l) Regulating mobile billboard advertising displays, as defined in Section 395.5, including the establishment of penalties, which may include, but are not limited to, removal of the mobile billboard advertising display, civil penalties, and misdemeanor criminal penalties for a violation of the ordinance or resolution. The ordinance or resolution may establish a minimum distance that a mobile billboard advertising display shall be moved after a specified time period.(m) Licensing and regulating the operation of pedicabs for hire, as defined in Section 467.5, and operators of pedicabs for hire, including requiring one or more of the following documents:(1) A valid California driver’s license.(2) Proof of successful completion of a bicycle safety training course certified by the League of American Bicyclists or an equivalent organization as determined by the local authority.(3) A valid California identification card and proof of successful completion of the written portion of the California driver’s license examination administered by the department. The department shall administer, without charging a fee, the original driver’s license written examination on traffic laws and signs to a person who states that they are, or intend to become, a pedicab operator and who holds a valid California identification card or has successfully completed an application for a California identification card. If the person achieves a passing score on the examination, the department shall issue a certificate of successful completion of the examination bearing the person’s name and identification card number. The certificate shall not serve in lieu of successful completion of the required examination administered as part of any subsequent application for a driver’s license. The department is not required to enter the results of the examination into the computerized record of the person’s identification card or otherwise retain a record of the examination or results.(n) (1) This section does not authorize a local authority to enact or enforce an ordinance or resolution that establishes a violation if a violation for the same or similar conduct is provided in this code, nor does it authorize a local authority to enact or enforce an ordinance or resolution that assesses a fine, penalty, assessment, or fee for a violation if a fine, penalty, assessment, or fee for a violation involving the same or similar conduct is provided in this code.(2) This section does not preclude a local authority from enacting parking ordinances pursuant to existing authority in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 11.(o) (1) Regulating advertising signs on motor vehicles parked or left standing upon a public street. The ordinance or resolution may establish a minimum distance that the advertising sign shall be moved after a specified time period.(2) Paragraph (1) does not apply to any of the following:(A) Advertising signs that are permanently affixed to the body of, an integral part of, or a fixture of a motor vehicle for permanent decoration, identification, or display and that do not extend beyond the overall length, width, or height of the vehicle.(B) If the license plate frame is installed in compliance with Section 5201, paper advertisements issued by a dealer contained within that license plate frame or any advertisements on that license plate frame.(3) As used in paragraph (2), “permanently affixed” means any of the following:(A) Painted directly on the body of a motor vehicle.(B) Applied as a decal on the body of a motor vehicle.(C) Placed in a location on the body of a motor vehicle that was specifically designed by a vehicle manufacturer, as defined in Section 672, and licensed pursuant to Section 11701, in compliance with both state and federal law or guidelines, for the express purpose of containing an advertising sign.(p) Regulating the operation of off-highway motor vehicles subject to identification pursuant to Section 38010 by peace officers, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or first responders, as defined in Section 8562 of the Government Code, on highways within the local authority’s jurisdiction while performing official duties subject to the following requirements:(1) The applicable local authority shall adopt a policy or plan for the use of off-highway motor vehicles by peace officers or first-responders on highways while performing official duties after public review. The policy or plan shall be made available to the public on the local authority’s internet website.(2) The policy or plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(A) A requirement that off-highway motor vehicles may only be operated on a highway for up to five miles for the purpose of accessing an off-highway recreational area or a location of patrol.(B) A description of the activities or locations for which the local authority seeks to authorize operation of off-highway motor vehicles pursuant to this subdivision and the approximate timeframe or duration of the authorization.(C) A description of any training, certification, or safety equipment that will be required by the local authority to ensure the safety of the public, including drivers and passengers.SEC. 2. Section 38025 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:38025. In accordance with subdivision (c) of Section 4000, a motor vehicle issued a plate or device pursuant to Section 38160 may be operated or driven upon a highway but only as follows:(a) On a two-lane highway, only to cross the highway at an angle of approximately 90 degrees to the direction of the roadway and at a place where a quick and safe crossing may be made, or only when the roadway is not maintained by snow removal equipment and is closed to motor vehicles that are subject to registration pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 4000), or only to cross a highway in the manner specified in subdivision (b).(b) With respect to the crossing of a highway having more than two lanes, or a highway having limited access, a motor vehicle may cross a highway but only at a place designated by the Department of Transportation or local authorities with respect to a highway under their respective jurisdictions as a place where a motor vehicle, or specified types of motor vehicle, may cross a highway, and a vehicle shall cross the highway only at that designated place and only in a quick and safe manner.(c) The Department of Transportation and local authorities with respect to a highway under their respective jurisdictions may designate, by the erection of an appropriate sign of a type approved by the Department of Transportation, a place where a motor vehicle, or specified type of motor vehicle, may cross a highway having more than two lanes or having limited access.(d) A motor vehicle identified pursuant to Section 38010 may be towed upon a highway, but not driven, if the vehicle displays a plate or device issued pursuant to Section 38160.(e) A motorcycle identified pursuant to Section 38010 may be pushed upon a highway, but not ridden, if the motorcycle has displayed upon it a plate or device issued pursuant to Section 38160.(f) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or a first responder, as defined in Section 8562 of the Government Code, may operate or drive an off-highway motor vehicle identified pursuant to Section 38010 upon a highway in an emergency response situation.(g) (1) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or a first responder, as defined in Section 8562 of the Government Code, may operate or drive an off-highway motor vehicle identified pursuant to Section 38010 upon a highway while performing official duties if all of the following apply:(A) The distance traveled on the highway by the off-highway motor vehicle does not exceed five miles.(B) The purpose of the travel is to access an off-highway recreational area or a location of patrol.(C) A local authority, as defined by Section 385, of the jurisdiction in which the off-highway motor vehicle will be operated has adopted a policy or plan for the operation of off-highway motor vehicles by peace officers or first responders while performing official duties pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 21100.(2) A peace officer or first responder operating an off-highway motor vehicle pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with the terms and requirements of the policy or plan adopted by the applicable local authority pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 21100.